Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.615

"Active," "inactive" registered voters—"Pending" registrations.

(1) Registered voters are divided into two categories, "active" and "inactive." All registered voters are classified as active, unless assigned to inactive status by the county auditor.

(2) Persons signing up to register to vote as future voters as defined under RCW 29A.04.070 are classified as "pending" until the person will be at least eighteen years of age by the next election, or eligible to participate in the next presidential primary or primary under RCW 29A.08.110 or 29A.08.170.

[ 2023 c 361 s 6; 2018 c 109 s 9; 2003 c 111 s 238. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 34. Formerly RCW 29.10.015.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.